Hawaii statutes.
[§11-358] Contributions to
noncandidate committees; limits. No person shall make contributions to a
noncandidate committee in an aggregate amount greater than $1,000 in an
election. This section shall not apply to ballot issue committees. [L 2010, c
211, pt of §2]

Case Notes

Contribution limit in this section is unconstitutional as
applied to plaintiffs' proposed contributions to an entity that engages in
solely independent expenditures in excess of the statutory limit; plaintiffs'
motion for preliminary injunction granted. 744 F. Supp. 2d 1075 (2010).

Plaintiffs, who sought a declaration stating that this
section was facially unconstitutional at the preliminary injunction stage,
would not likely succeed on the merits; this section's limitation appears to be
valid as applied to contributions to a noncandidate committee that does not
engage solely in independent expenditures; plaintiff's motion for preliminary
injunction denied as to this issue. 744 F. Supp. 2d 1075 (2010).

Plaintiff donors to political action committee had standing
to challenge this section; they desired to and eventually made contributions
that exceeded the statutory limitations, giving rise to an actual controversy;
further, if this section was constitutional as applied, they could have been
subject to administrative fines or criminal prosecution; moreover, they
indicated a legitimate desire to make similar contributions in 2012, and thus a
favorable ruling would have allowed them to make further contributions in 2012
without violating the law. 872 F. Supp. 2d 1023 (2012).

This section limits the amount of contributions a person can
make to a noncandidate committee ("committee"); if the committee
makes only independent expenditures, then pursuant to the U.S. Supreme Court in
Citizens United, Hawaii cannot limit those expenditures; plaintiff donors'
contributions to a committee could only lead to independent expenditures;
therefore, this section was unconstitutional as applied to plaintiffs'
contributions to a committee and defendant campaign spending commission was
permanently enjoined from enforcing this section's contribution limitation in
that situation. 872 F. Supp. 2d 1023 (2012).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next